en: Tennis ball court surface: All Court; Clay Court; Grass Court; Hard Court; High Altitude; Indoor; Indoor Carpet; Other
ro-RO: Suprafață de teren pentru mingea de tenis: Toate suprafețele; Zgură; Iarbă; Teren dur; Altitudine ridicată; Interior; Mochetă de interior; Altele
th: พื้นสนามเทนนิส: ทุกพื้นผิวสนาม; คอร์ตดิน; คอร์ตหญ้า; ฮาร์ดคอร์ต; พื้นที่สูง; ในร่ม; คอร์ตพรมในร่ม; อื่นๆ
nb: Tennisball-baneoverflate: All-court; Grusbane; Gressbane; Hardcourt; Høytliggende bane; Innendørs; Innendørs teppe; Annet
pt-BR: Bola de tênis superfície da quadra: Todas as quadras; Quadra de saibro; Quadra de grama; Quadra rápida; Altitude elevada; Quadra coberta; Quadra coberta de carpete; Outra
tr: Tenis topu kortu yüzeyi: Tüm kortlar; Toprak kort; Çim kort; Sert kort; Yüksek rakım; Kapalı alan; Kapalı alan halı; Diğer
da: Baneoverflade for tennisbold: All court; Grusbane; Græsbane; Hardcourt; Højdeområder; Indendørs; Indendørs tæppe; Andet
hr-HR: Površina terena za tenis s lopticama: Svi tereni; Zemljani teren; Travnati teren; Tvrdi teren; Visoka nadmorska visina; Dvorana; Dvoranski tepih; Ostalo
fi: Tenniskentän alustatyyppi: Kaikki alustat; Massakenttä; Ruohokenttä; Kovapintainen kenttä; Korkea ilmanala; Sisäkenttä; Sisämatto; Muu
pl: Nawierzchnia kortu do tenisa ziemnego: Wszystkie nawierzchnie (All Court); Korty ziemne (mączka); Korty trawiaste; Korty twarde; Duże wysokości; Hale; Korty dywanowe (hala); Inne
fr: Surface de court pour balle de tennis: Toutes surfaces; Terre battue; Gazon; Surface dure; Haute altitude; Intérieur; Moquette d’intérieur; Autre
pt-PT: Superfície de jogo da bola de ténis: Todas as superfícies; Terra batida; Relva; Piso duro; Alta altitude; Interior; Alcatifa interior; Outro
ru: Покрытие корта для теннисного мяча: Любое покрытие; Грунтовый корт; Травяной корт; Твёрдое покрытие (хард); Высокогорье; В помещении; Ковровое покрытие в помещении; Другое
it: Superficie del campo della pallina da tennis: Tutte le superfici; Terra rossa; Erba; Cemento; Alta quota; Indoor; Moquette indoor; Altro
cs: Povrch tenisového kurtu: Všechny povrchy; Antuka; Tráva; Tvrdý povrch; Vysoká nadmořská výška; Hala; Kobercový povrch v hale; Jiné
zh-CN: 网球适用场地: 全场; 红土球场; 草地球场; 硬地球场; 高海拔球场; 室内; 室内地毯; 其他
bg-BG: Тип настилка за тенис топка: Всякакви настилки; Червен корт; Тревен корт; Твърд корт; Голяма надморска височина; На закрито; Килим на закрито; Друго
de: Belag des Tennisplatzes: All-Court; Sandplatz; Rasenplatz; Hartplatz; Höhenlage; Halle; Teppichboden (Halle); Sonstige
ko: 테니스공용 코트 표면: 올 코트; 클레이 코트; 잔디 코트; 하드 코트; 하이 알티튜드; 실내; 실내 카펫; 기타
vi: Mặt sân bóng tennis: Mọi loại sân; Sân đất nện; Sân cỏ; Sân cứng; Sân độ cao lớn; Trong nhà; Sân thảm trong nhà; Khác
ja: テニスボール対応コート面: オールコート; クレーコート; グラスコート; ハードコート; ハイアルティチュード; インドア; インドアカーペット; その他
sl-SI: Površina teniškega igrišča: Vse podlage; Peščeno igrišče; Travnato igrišče; Trda podlaga; Visoka nadmorska višina; Dvoransko; Dvoranska preproga; Drugo
lt-LT: Teniso kamuoliuko aikštelės paviršius: Universali; Gruntas; Žolė; Kieta danga; Aukštikalnių; Uždarų patalpų; Uždarų patalpų kiliminė; Kita
sv: Tennisbollplanens yta: Alla underlag; Grus; Gräs; Hardcourt; Hög höjd; Inomhus; Inomhusmatta; Annat
hu: Teniszpálya borítása: Minden borítás; Salakpálya; Füves pálya; Kemény pálya; Nagy tengerszint feletti magasság; Beltéri; Beltéri szőnyegpálya; Egyéb
es: Superficie de la cancha de tenis: Todas las canchas; Cancha de arcilla; Cancha de césped; Cancha dura; Gran altitud; Interiores; Alfombra para interiores; Otra
zh-TW: 網球場地表面: 全場地; 紅土球場; 草地球場; 硬地球場; 高海拔; 室內; 室內地毯; 其他
nl: Tennisbal baanoppervlak: Alle ondergronden; Gravel; Gras; Hardcourt; Grote hoogte; Indoor; Tapijt (indoor); Overig
sk-SK: Povrch tenisového kurtu: Na všetky povrchy; Antukový dvorec; Trávnatý dvorec; Tvrdý povrch; Vysoká nadmorská výška; Do interiéru; Kobercový povrch; Iné
el: Επιφάνεια γηπέδου τένις: Για όλα τα γήπεδα; Χωμάτινο γήπεδο; Γήπεδο με γρασίδι; Σκληρό γήπεδο; Υψηλό υψόμετρο; Εσωτερικού χώρου; Γήπεδο με μοκέτα; Άλλο